Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 5. Allocation and Payment at Beginning and End of Income Interest.

Sec. 13.38.550.
When right to income begins and ends.

An income beneficiary is entitled to net income from the date on which the income interest begins. An income interest begins

on the date specified in the governing instrument; or

if a date is not specified, on the date an asset becomes subject to a trust or successive income interest.

An asset becomes subject to a trust on the date

it is transferred to the trust, in the case of an asset that is transferred to a trust during the transferor’s life;

of a testator’s death, in the case of an asset that becomes subject to a trust by reason of a will, even if there is an intervening period of administration of the testator’s estate; or

of an individual’s death, in the case of an asset that is transferred to a fiduciary by a third party because of the individual’s death.

An asset becomes subject to a successive income interest on the day after the preceding income interest ends, as determined under (d) of this section, even if there is an intervening period of administration to wind up the preceding income interest.

An income interest ends on

the day before an income beneficiary dies or another terminating event occurs; or

the last day of a period during which there is not a beneficiary to whom a trustee may distribute income.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.560.
Allocation of receipts and disbursements when decedent dies or income interest begins.

Unless AS

13.38.500

(1) applies, a trustee shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement to principal if its due date occurs before

a decedent dies, in the case of an estate; or

an income interest begins, in the case of a trust or successive income interest.

A trustee shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement to income if its due date occurs on or after the date on which a decedent dies or an income interest begins and its due date is periodic. An income receipt or disbursement shall be treated as accruing from day to day if its due date is not periodic or it does not have a due date. The portion of the receipt or disbursement accruing before the date on which a decedent dies or an income interest begins shall be allocated to principal, and the balance shall be allocated to income.

An item of income or an obligation is due on the date the payor is required to make a payment. If a payment date is not stated, there is not a due date for the purposes of this chapter. Distributions to shareholders or other owners from an entity to which AS

13.38.600

applies are considered to be due on the date fixed by the entity for determining who is entitled to receive the distribution or, if a date is not fixed, on the declaration date for the distribution. A due date is periodic for receipts or disbursements that must be paid at regular intervals under a lease or an obligation to pay interest or if an entity customarily makes distributions at regular intervals.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.570.
Payment when income interest ends.

When a mandatory income interest ends, the trustee shall pay to a mandatory income beneficiary who survives that date, or the estate of a deceased mandatory income beneficiary whose death causes the interest to end, the beneficiary’s share of the undistributed income that is not disposed of under the governing instrument unless the beneficiary has an unqualified power to revoke more than five percent of the trust immediately before the income interest ends. In the case of the beneficiary who has an unqualified power to revoke more than five percent of the trust immediately before the income interest ends, the undistributed income from the portion of the trust that may be revoked shall be added to principal.

When a trustee’s obligation to pay a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust’s assets ends, the trustee shall prorate the final payment if and to the extent required by applicable law to accomplish a purpose of the trust or its settlor or testator relating to income, gift, estate, or other tax requirements.

In this section, “undistributed income” means net income received before the date on which an income interest ends, but does not include an item of income or expense that is due or accrued or net income that has been added or is required to be added to principal under the governing instrument.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)